Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.1699

Endangered wildlife license plates.

"Endangered wildlife license plates" means special license plates that display a symbol or artwork symbolizing endangered wildlife in Washington state.

[ 2010 c 161 s 115.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.